Vermont, session 2025-2026, H408.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Vermont recognizes the importance of local production and supply
as a means to empower communities, strengthen local economies, and ensure
access to healthy, locally produced foods;
(2) institutional purchasing from Vermont farms can significantly
bolster the State’s agricultural sector, support sustainable farming practices,
and promote economic resilience; and
(3) the State should support Vermont farms and the farming economy by
giving preference to local foods in the purchasing by State agencies, State
universities, and State colleges.
Sec. 2. 29 V.S.A. chapter 49, subchapter 3 is added to read:
Subchapter 3. State Purchasing of Food
§ 941. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Local food” has the same meaning as “local,” “local to Vermont,”
and “locally grown or made in Vermont” as in 9 V.S.A. § 2465a.
(2) “State agency” means any Executive Branch agency, department, or
entity created by Title 3 of the Vermont Statutes Annotated and any board,
VT LEG #380488 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.408
2025 Page 3 of 4
commission, council, or similar entity attached to an Executive Branch agency,
department, or entity.
(3) “State universities and colleges” means the University of Vermont
and the Vermont State Colleges.
(4) “State institution” means any State agency, any office of the State
judiciary, and any office of the General Assembly.
§ 942. STATE POLICY
It is the policy of the State to encourage the procurement of local foods by
State institutions and State universities and colleges to increase the viability of
Vermont farms and food businesses, thus making a positive contribution to the
State’s economy and enhancing food self-sufficiency for Vermont.
§ 943. PREFERENCE FOR LOCAL FOOD
(a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, and to the extent permitted by
federal law, a State institution or a State university or college purchasing food
shall provide a preference to local foods when local foods are comparable in
costs to foods that have not been grown or produced in the State.
(b) The person responsible for procuring food or other items on behalf of a
State institution or a State university or college shall purchase local foods
unless the price of local goods exceeds by more than 10 percent the price of
food or other agricultural products grown or produced that were not grown or
produced within Vermont.
VT LEG #380488 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.408
2025 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 3. 16 V.S.A. § 1266 is added to read:
§ 1266. FOOD SERVICE MANAGEMENT COMPANY BIDS
When a food service management company or other food supplier submits a
bid to a supervisory union, supervisory district, school board, or school in
response to a request for a proposal or bid solicitation to supply a school
nutrition program, the food service management company or food supplier
shall include in their bid information related to how the food service
management company or food supplier can supply a supervisory union,
supervisory district, school board, or school with locally produced foods that
would allow the supervisory union, supervisory district, school board, or
school to qualify for a local foods incentive grant under section 1264a of this
title.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380488 v.1